Illinois, session 104th, HB2393.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Downstate Forest Preserve District Act is 5amended by adding Section 13.9 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 805/13.9 new)7    Sec. 13.9. Special forest preserve districts retailers' 8and service occupation tax. 9    (a) The board of any district may impose a tax upon all 10persons engaged in the business of selling tangible personal 11property, other than personal property titled or registered 12with an agency of this State's government, at retail in the 13district on the gross receipts from the sales made in the 14course of business to provide revenue to be used for general 15forest district purposes, including education, outdoor 16recreation, maintenance, operations, public safety at the 17forest preserves, trails, acquiring and restoring land, and 18any other lawful purposes or programs determined by the board 19of that district, except as otherwise provided in this 20Section, if a proposition for the tax has been submitted to the 21electors of that district and approved by a majority of those 22voting on the question. If imposed, this tax shall be imposed 23only in 0.25% increments. By resolution, the board may order   HB2393- 2 -LRB104 06280 RTM 16315 b1the proposition to be submitted at any election.2    For a tax imposed for forest preserve purposes for 3expenditures authorized under this Act, the board must publish 4notice of the operational, capital, or master plan of the 5district, and must make the plan publicly available prior to 6approval of the ordinance or resolution imposing the tax.7    If a tax is imposed for specific operational needs, 8capital projects, or public facilities, then the name of the 9project may be included in the proposition at the discretion 10of the board as determined in the enabling resolution. For 11example, the "XXX Regional Trail," the "YYY Forest Preserve or 12Multi-Use Facility," or the "ZZZ Natural Area Acquisition or 13Restoration Project".14    The county clerk shall certify the question to the proper 15election authority, who shall submit the proposition at an 16election in accordance with the general election law.17    The proposition for forest preserve purposes shall be in 18substantially the following form:19        "To pay for (forest preserve purposes), shall (name of 20    district) be authorized to impose an increase on its share 21    of local sales taxes by (insert rate)?"22    The following additional information shall appear on the 23ballot below the question:24        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 25    additional (insert amount) in sales tax for every $100 of 26    tangible personal property bought at retail."  HB2393- 3 -LRB104 06280 RTM 16315 b1    The board may also vote to establish a sunset provision at 2which time the additional sales tax would cease being 3collected, if not terminated earlier by a vote of the board. If 4the board votes to include a sunset provision, the proposition 5for forest preserve purposes shall be in substantially the 6following form:7        "To pay for (forest preserve purposes), shall (name of 8    district) be authorized to impose an increase on its share 9    of local sales taxes by (insert rate) for a period not to 10    exceed (insert number of years)?"11    The following additional information shall appear on the 12ballot below the question:13        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 14    additional (insert amount) in sales tax for every $100 of 15    tangible personal property bought at retail. If imposed, 16    the additional tax would cease being collected at the end 17    of (insert number of years), if not terminated earlier by 18    a vote of the (name of district) board."19    Votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No".20    If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition 21vote in favor of it, the district may impose the tax.22    A district may not submit more than one proposition 23authorized by this Section to the electors at any one time.24    The board shall impose the tax upon all persons engaged in 25the business of selling tangible personal property, other than 26personal property titled or registered with an agency of this   HB2393- 4 -LRB104 06280 RTM 16315 b1State's government, at retail in the district on the gross 2receipts from the sales made in the course of business.3    (b) The tax imposed by the board under this Section and all 4civil penalties that may be assessed as an incident of the tax 5shall be collected and enforced by the Department of Revenue. 6The certificate of registration that is issued by the 7Department to a retailer under the Retailers' Occupation Tax 8Act shall permit the retailer to engage in a business that is 9taxable without registering separately with the Department 10under an ordinance or resolution under this Section. The 11Department has full power to administer and enforce this 12Section, to collect all taxes and penalties due under this 13Section, to dispose of taxes and penalties so collected in the 14manner provided in this Section, and to determine all rights 15to credit memoranda arising on account of the erroneous 16payment of a tax or penalty under this Section. In the 17administration of and compliance with this Section, the 18Department and persons who are subject to this Section shall 19(i) have the same rights, remedies, privileges, immunities, 20powers, and duties; (ii) be subject to the same conditions, 21restrictions, limitations, penalties, and definitions of 22terms; and (iii) employ the same modes of procedure as are 23prescribed in Sections 1, 1a, 1a-1, 1d, 1e, 1f, 1i, 1j, 1k, 1m, 241n, 2, 2-5, 2-5.5, 2-10 (in respect to all provisions 25contained in those Sections other than the State rate of tax), 262-12, 2-15 through 2-70, 2a, 2b, 2c, 3 (except provisions   HB2393- 5 -LRB104 06280 RTM 16315 b1relating to transaction returns and quarter monthly payments, 2and except that the retailer's discount is not allowed for 3taxes paid on aviation fuel that are subject to the revenue use 4requirements of 49 U.S.C. 47107(b) and 49 U.S.C. 47133) and 5Sections 4, 5, 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5h, 5i, 5j, 5k, 5l, 66, 6a, 6b, 6c, 6d, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 11a, 12, and 13 of the 7Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and the Uniform Penalty and 8Interest Act as if those provisions were set forth in this 9Section.10    Persons subject to any tax imposed under the authority 11granted in this Section may reimburse themselves for their 12sellers' tax liability by separately stating the tax as an 13additional charge. The charge may be stated in combination, in 14a single amount, with State tax which sellers are required to 15collect under the Use Tax Act, pursuant to such bracketed 16schedules as the Department may prescribe.17    If the Department determines that a refund should be made 18under this Section to a claimant instead of issuing a credit 19memorandum, then the Department shall notify the State 20Comptroller, who shall cause the order to be drawn for the 21amount specified and to the person named in the notification 22from the Department. The refund shall be paid by the State 23Treasurer out of the Special Forest Preserve Retailers' and 24Service Occupation Tax Fund.25    (c) If a tax has been imposed under subsection (a), then a 26service occupation tax shall also be imposed at the same rate   HB2393- 6 -LRB104 06280 RTM 16315 b1upon all persons in the district engaged in the business of 2making sales of service, who, as an incident to making those 3sales of service, transfer tangible personal property within 4the district as an incident to a sale of service. The tax 5imposed under this Section and all civil penalties that may be 6assessed as an incident thereof shall be collected and 7enforced by the Department of Revenue. The Department has full 8power to administer and enforce this Section; to collect all 9taxes and penalties due hereunder; to dispose of taxes and 10penalties so collected in the manner hereinafter provided; and 11to determine all rights to credit memoranda arising on account 12of the erroneous payment of tax or penalty hereunder. In the 13administration of, and compliance with this Section, the 14Department and persons who are subject to this paragraph shall 15(i) have the same rights, remedies, privileges, immunities, 16powers, and duties; (ii) be subject to the same conditions, 17restrictions, limitations, penalties, exclusions, exemptions, 18and definitions of terms; and (iii) employ the same modes of 19procedure as are prescribed in Sections 2 (except that the 20reference to State in the definition of supplier maintaining a 21place of business in this State shall mean the district), 2a, 222b, 2c, 3 through 3-50 (in respect to all provisions therein 23other than the State rate of tax), 4 (except that the reference 24to the State shall be to the district), 5, 7, 8 (except that 25the jurisdiction to which the tax shall be a debt to the extent 26indicated in that Section 8 shall be the district), 9 (except   HB2393- 7 -LRB104 06280 RTM 16315 b1as to the disposition of taxes and penalties collected, and 2except that the retailer's discount is not allowed for taxes 3paid on aviation fuel that are subject to the revenue use 4requirements of 49 U.S.C. 47107(b) and 49 U.S.C. 47133), 10, 511, 12 (except the reference therein to Section 2b of the 6Retailers' Occupation Tax Act), 13 (except that any reference 7to the State shall mean the district), Sections 15, 16, 17, 18, 819 and 20 of the Service Occupation Tax Act and the Uniform 9Penalty and Interest Act, as fully as if those provisions were 10set forth herein.11    Persons subject to any tax imposed under the authority 12granted in this Section may reimburse themselves for their 13serviceman's tax liability by separately stating the tax as an 14additional charge, which charge may be stated in combination, 15in a single amount, with State tax that servicemen are 16authorized to collect under the Service Use Tax Act, in 17accordance with such bracket schedules as the Department may 18prescribe.19    If the Department determines that a refund should be made 20under this subsection to a claimant instead of issuing a 21credit memorandum, then the Department shall notify the State 22Comptroller, who shall cause the warrant to be drawn for the 23amount specified, and to the person named, in the notification 24from the Department. The refund shall be paid by the State 25Treasurer out of the Special Forest Preserve Retailers' and 26Service Occupation Tax Fund.  HB2393- 8 -LRB104 06280 RTM 16315 b1    Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize 2the board to impose a tax upon the privilege of engaging in any 3business that under the Constitution of the United States may 4not be made the subject of taxation by the State.5    (d) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the 6Department shall immediately pay over to the State Treasurer, 7ex officio, as trustee, all taxes and penalties collected 8under this Section to be deposited into the Special Forest 9Preserve Retailers' and Service Occupation Tax Fund, a special 10fund that is created in the State treasury that and the moneys 11in the fund shall be disbursed as provided in this Section.12    As soon as possible after the first day of each month and 13upon certification of the Department of Revenue, the 14Comptroller shall order transferred, and the Treasurer shall 15transfer, to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund the local sales tax 16increment, as defined in the Innovation Development and 17Economy Act, collected under this Section during the second 18preceding calendar month for sales within a STAR bond 19district. The Department shall make this certification only if 20the district imposes a tax on real property as provided in the 21definition of "local sales taxes" under the Innovation 22Development and Economy Act.23    After the monthly transfer to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund, 24on or before the 25th day of each calendar month, the 25Department shall prepare and certify to the Comptroller the 26disbursement of the stated sums of money to the district from   HB2393- 9 -LRB104 06280 RTM 16315 b1which retailers have paid taxes or penalties to the Department 2during the second preceding calendar month. The amount to be 3paid to the district shall be the amount collected under this 4Section during the second preceding calendar month by the 5Department plus an amount the Department determines is 6necessary to offset any amounts that were erroneously paid to 7a different taxing body, and not including (i) an amount equal 8to the amount of refunds made during the second preceding 9calendar month by the Department on behalf of the district; 10(ii) any amount that the Department determines is necessary to 11offset any amounts that were payable to a different taxing 12body but were erroneously paid to the District; (iii) any 13amounts that are transferred to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund, 14and (iv) 1.5% of the remainder, which the Department shall 15transfer into the Tax Compliance and Administration Fund. The 16Department, at the time of each monthly disbursement to the 17district, shall prepare and certify to the State Comptroller 18the amount to be transferred into the Tax Compliance and 19Administration Fund under this subsection. Within 10 days 20after receipt by the Comptroller of the disbursement 21certification to the District and the Tax Compliance and 22Administration Fund provided for in this Section to be given 23to the Comptroller by the Department, the Comptroller shall 24cause the orders to be drawn for the respective amounts in 25accordance with directions contained in the certification.26    (e) For the purpose of determining whether a tax   HB2393- 10 -LRB104 06280 RTM 16315 b1authorized under this Section is applicable, a retail sale by 2a producer of coal or another mineral mined in Illinois is a 3sale at retail at the place where the coal or other mineral 4mined in Illinois is extracted from the earth. This paragraph 5does not apply to coal or another mineral when it is delivered 6or shipped by the seller to the purchaser at a point outside 7Illinois so that the sale is exempt under the United States 8Constitution as a sale in interstate or foreign commerce.9    (f) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 10authorize the board to impose a tax upon the privilege of 11engaging in any business that under the Constitution of the 12United States may not be made the subject of taxation by this 13State.14    (g) An ordinance imposing a tax under this Section shall 15be certified by the board and filed with the Department of 16Revenue either (i) after the first day of October but on or 17before the first day of April, whereupon the Department shall 18proceed to administer and enforce the tax as of the first day 19of July next following the filing; or (ii) after the first day 20of April but on or before the first day of October, whereupon 21the Department shall proceed to administer and enforce the tax 22as of the first day of January next following the filing.23    (h) When certifying the amount of a monthly disbursement 24to the district under this Section, the Department shall 25increase or decrease the amounts by an amount necessary to 26offset any misallocation of previous disbursements. The offset   HB2393- 11 -LRB104 06280 RTM 16315 b1amount shall be the amount erroneously disbursed within the 2previous 6 months from the time a misallocation is discovered. 3    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 4Section 5.1030 as follows: 5    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)6    Sec. 5.1030. The Special Forest Preserve Retailers' and 7Service Occupation Tax Fund. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.